Utah statutes.
4-32-16.   Detention of animals or meat or poultry products -- Removal of
official marks.
(1)  Whenever any meat or poultry product or any product exempted from the
definition of a meat or poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or
diseased animal, is found by any authorized representative of the
commissioner, and there is reason to believe that it is adulterated or
misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been
inspected and passed, or that it has been or is intended to be distributed in
violation of this chapter, it may be detained by the representative pending
action under Section 4-32-17, and may not be moved by any person from the
place at which it is located when so detained, until released by such
representative.
(2)  All official marks may be required by the representative described in
Subsection (1) to be removed from a product or animal described in Subsection
(1) before the product is released.
